Utah statutes.
79-3-508.   Agency responsibilities -- Allowing director reasonable opportunity to comment.

(1)  Before expending state funds or approving an undertaking, each state agency shall:

(a)  take into account the effect of the undertaking on a specimen that is included in or eligible for inclusion in the State Paleontological Register; and

(b)  allow the director or assigned staff a reasonable opportunity to comment regarding the undertaking or expenditure.

(2)  The director or assigned staff shall advise on ways to maximize the amount of scientific, paleontological, and educational information recovered, in addition to the physical recovery of specimens and the reporting of paleontological information, at current standards of scientific rigor.

